District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.82

Repealers.

(a)

Sections 2-215.03, 2-215.04, and 2-215.11 are repealed.

(b)

Subchapter IX of Chapter 2 of Title 2 [§ 2-217.01 et seq.] is repealed.

(c)

An order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law repealed by this section shall remain in effect under the corresponding provision enacted by this subtitle [Subtitle N of Title II of D.C. Law 16-33, §§ 2301 to 2391], until repealed, amended, or superseded.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382, 52 DCR 7503
Washington convention center authority, general powers, see § 10-1202.03.
Property exempt from taxation, supermarket developments, see § 47-1002.
License fee exemption, supermarket developments, see § 47-2827.